test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-chaustok_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čâustõk e-stem suopunki: # Noun - full paradigm
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čâustõk
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čâustõʹǩǩe
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čâustõõǥǥâst
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čâustõõǥǥin
     čâustõk+N+Ess+Indef: čâustõkkân
     čâustõk+N+Par+Indef: čâustõkkâd
     čâustõk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čâustõõǥǥtaa, čâustõõǥǥtää]
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čâustõõǥǥ
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čâustõõǥǥi
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čâustõõǥǥid
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čâustõõǥǥid
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čâustõõǥǥin
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čâustõõǥǥivuiʹm
     čâustõk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čâustõõǥǥitaa, čâustõõǥǥitää]
